Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB144.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "dependent child" in section 6302 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Dependent child." A child who:(1) is without proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or 1234567891011121314151617 control necessary for his physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals. A determination that there is a lack of proper parental care or control may be based upon evidence of conduct by the parent, guardian or other custodian that places the health, safety or welfare of the child at risk, including evidence of the parent's, guardian's or other custodian's use of alcohol or a controlled substance that places the health, safety or welfare of the child at risk;(2) has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;(3) has been abandoned by his parents, guardian, or other custodian;(4) is without a parent, guardian, or legal custodian;(5) while subject to compulsory school attendance is habitually and without justification truant from school;(6) has committed a specific act or acts of habitual disobedience of the reasonable and lawful commands of his parent, guardian or other custodian and who is ungovernable and found to be in need of care, treatment or supervision;(7) has committed a delinquent act or crime, other than a summary offense, while under the age of ten years;(8) has been formerly adjudicated dependent, and is under the jurisdiction of the court, subject to its conditions or placements and who commits an act which is defined as ungovernable in paragraph (6);(9) has been referred pursuant to section 6323 (relating to informal adjustment and diversion), and who commits an act which is defined as ungovernable in paragraph (6); or(10) is born to a parent whose parental rights with regard to another child have been involuntarily terminated 20250HB0144PN2858 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under 23 Pa.C.S. § 2511 (relating to grounds for involuntary termination) within three years immediately preceding the date of birth of the child and conduct of the parent poses a risk to the health, safety or welfare of the child.* * *Section 2. Section 6323 of Title 42, amended October 16, 2024 (P.L.1006, No.108), is amended to read:§ 6323. Informal adjustment and diversion.(a) General rule.--(1) Before a petition is filed, the probation officer or other officer of the court designated by it, subject to its direction, shall, in the case of a dependent child where the jurisdiction of the court is premised upon the provisions of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), (5) or (7) of the definition of "dependent child" in section 6302 (relating to definitions) and if otherwise appropriate, refer the child and [his] the child's parents to any public or private social agency available for assisting in the matter. Upon referral, the agency shall indicate its willingness to accept the child and shall report back to the referring officer within three months concerning the status of the referral.(2) Similarly, the probation officer may in the case of a delinquent child, or a dependent child where the jurisdiction of the court is permitted under paragraph (6) of the definition of "dependent child" in section 6302, refer the child and [his] the child's parents to an agency for assisting in the matter.(3) The agency may return the referral to the probation officer, local government agency or other officer for further informal adjustment or other diversion program if it is in 20250HB0144PN2858 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the best interests of the child.(b) Counsel and advice.--Such social agencies and the probation officer or other officer of the court [may]:(1) May give counsel and advice to the parties with a view to an informal adjustment or other diversion program if it appears:[(1)] (i) counsel and advice without an adjudication would be in the best interest of the public and the child;[(2)] (ii) the child and [his] the child's parents, guardian, or other custodian consent thereto with knowledge that consent is not obligatory; and[(3)] (iii) in the case of the probation officer or other officer of the court, the admitted facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court.(2) Shall offer the child an opportunity to complete an informal adjustment or other diversion program if:(i) the child has fewer than three prior informal adjustments or prepetition diversions in the past three years;(ii) the child is referred for any offense except those enumerated in section 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses) or 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder);(iii) the child and the child's parents, guardian or other custodian provide informed consent, with knowledge that consent is not obligatory; and(iv) in the opinion of the probation officer or other officer of the court, the admitted facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court.20250HB0144PN2858 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b.1) Construction.--Nothing in subsection (b) shall be construed to prevent a probation officer from offering an informal adjustment or other diversion program when it is in the best interest of the child, the victim and the public, consistent with subsection (h).(c) Limitation on duration of counsel and advice.--The giving of counsel and advice by the probation or other officer of the court shall not extend beyond [six] four months from the day commenced unless extended by an order of court for an additional period not to exceed [three] two months.(d) No detention authorized or admission of guilt.--Nothing contained in this section shall authorize the detention of the child[.] or require an admission of guilt as a prerequisite to any informal adjustment or diversion program.(d.1) No monetary obligations other than restitution authorized.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an informal adjustment or other diversion program under this section shall not incorporate fines, fees, costs or other monetary obligation, nor shall a child with an informal adjustment be ordered to participate in a program or service that requires the child or the child's family to pay a fee, cost or other monetary obligation, except costs imposed under section 1101 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.(e) Privileged statements.--An incriminating statement made by a participant to the person giving counsel or advice and in the discussions or conferences incident thereto shall not be used against the declarant over objection in any criminal proceeding or hearing under this chapter.(f) Terms and conditions.--The terms and conditions of an 20250HB0144PN2858 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 informal adjustment may include payment by the child of reasonable amounts of [money as costs, fees or] restitution, including a [supervision fee and] contribution to a restitution fund established by the president judge of the court of common pleas pursuant to section 6352(a)(5) (relating to disposition of delinquent child).(g) Expungement of records.--Upon motion, or sua sponte, including upon receiving notice under section 6304(a.2) (relating to powers and duties of probation officers), the court shall commence expungement proceedings under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9123 (relating to juvenile records) and the Pennsylvania Rules of Juvenile Court Procedure if the court finds:(1) six months have elapsed since the child's successful discharge from informal adjustment supervision; and(2) no proceeding seeking adjudication or conviction is pending.(h) Notification and input to victims.--Prior to final acceptance of a juvenile into a diversion program, the district attorney or juvenile probation office shall notify the victim of the alleged offense, eligibility criteria for diversion, conditions or program proposed, and the victim's opportunity to provide a written or oral statement:(1) Providing the victim's perspective on the offense and proposed diversion.(2) Requesting consideration of restitution, community service or other appropriate conditions of diversion.(3) If applicable, and to the extent available and appropriate, indicating a preference regarding participation in restorative justice or victim-offender dialogue.(4) Requesting protective measures and reasonable 20250HB0144PN2858 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accommodations.(5) Providing input on any other victim-relevant considerations.(H) NOTIFICATION AND INPUT TO VICTIMS.--(1) PRIOR TO FINAL ACCEPTANCE OF A JUVENILE INTO A DIVERSION PROGRAM, THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY OR JUVENILE PROBATION OFFICE SHALL NOTIFY THE VICTIM OF THE ALLEGED OFFENSE, ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR DIVERSION, CONDITIONS OR PROGRAM PROPOSED, AND THE VICTIM'S OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE A WRITTEN OR ORAL STATEMENT WITHIN 30 DAYS OF NOTIFICATION:(I) PROVIDING THE VICTIM'S PERSPECTIVE ON THE OFFENSE AND PROPOSED DIVERSION.(II) REQUESTING CONSIDERATION OF RESTITUTION, COMMUNITY SERVICE OR OTHER APPROPRIATE CONDITIONS OF DIVERSION.(III) IF APPLICABLE, AND TO THE EXTENT AVAILABLE AND APPROPRIATE, INDICATING A PREFERENCE REGARDING PARTICIPATION IN RESTORATIVE JUSTICE OR VICTIM-OFFENDER DIALOGUE.(IV) REQUESTING PROTECTIVE MEASURES AND REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS.(V) PROVIDING INPUT ON ANY OTHER VICTIM-RELEVANT CONSIDERATIONS.(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B)(2), IF THE JUVENILE'S VICTIM OPPOSES THE JUVENILE'S COMPLETION OF INFORMAL ADJUSTMENT OR ENTRY INTO A DIVERSION PROGRAM, THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY OR JUVENILE PROBATION OFFICE SHALL NOTIFY THE COURT AND THE COURT SHALL FIX A TIME FOR A REVIEW HEARING WHICH, IF THE CHILD IS IN DETENTION OR SHELTER CARE, SHALL NOT BE LATER THAN 10 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION TO THE COURT FROM THE 20250HB0144PN2858 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DISTRICT ATTORNEY OR JUVENILE PROBATION OFFICE.(i) Construction and confidentiality.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude rights of victims of crime established by the Crime Victims Act, or responsibilities established by section 1318.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949 . All communications and notifications pursuant to this section shall be maintained as confidential.(j) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "diversion program" means an alternative to initial or continued formal processing of youths in the juvenile delinquency system.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0144PN2858 - 8 - 123456789101112